Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1410.01
Railbanking, defined.

Railbanking means the purchase of abandoned light-density rail lines for future rail or other transportation purposes.

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 463, § 14.